Utah statutes.
70D-2-103.   Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to:

(1)  a bona fide nonprofit corporation that grants a first mortgage loan to promote home ownership for low and moderate income borrowers;

(2)  an agency of the following that grants a first mortgage loan under a specific federal or state law:

(a) the federal government;

(b)  a state, county, or municipal government; or

(c)  a quasi-governmental agency;

(3)  a casual lender that makes less than five mortgage loans a year; or

(4)  a mortgage loan of two years or less.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 72, 2009 General Session

